Utah statutes.
75-1-105.   Construction against implied repeal.

This code is a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, and no part of it shall be deemed impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if it can reasonably be avoided. 



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

